test/src/morphology/adj-1.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Adjectives that belong to LEXICON HÁVSSKE, GIEVRRA and JUHKKE. Even-syllable stems with attribute -s.

Tests:

  Adjective - jalla: #  GIEVRRA
    jalla+A+Attr: jallas
    jalla+A+Sg+Nom: jalla
    jalla+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: jallap
    jalla+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: jallamus

  Adjective - loadtje: # GIEVRRA
    loadtje+A+Attr: loattjes 
    loadtje+A+Sg+Nom: loadjte 
    loadtje+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: loattjep
    loadtje+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: loattjemus

  Adjective - vallje: # GIEVRRA
    vallje+A+Attr: valjes 
    vallje+A+Sg+Nom: vallje
    vallje+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: valjep
    vallje+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: valjemus


  Adjective - hávsske: # HÁVSSKE
    hávsske+A+Attr: hávsskes
    hávsske+A+Sg+Nom: hávsske
    hávsske+A+Sg+Gen: hávsske
    hávsske+A+Sg+Acc: hávsskev
    hávsske+A+Sg+Ill: hávsskáj
    hávsske+A+Sg+Ine: hávssken
    hávsske+A+Sg+Ela: hávsskes
    hávsske+A+Sg+Com: hávsskijn
    hávsske+A+Pl+Nom: hávsske
    hávsske+A+Pl+Gen: hávsskij
    hávsske+A+Pl+Acc: hávsskijt
    hávsske+A+Pl+Ill: hávsskijda
    hávsske+A+Pl+Ine: hávsskijn
    hávsske+A+Pl+Ela: hávsskijs
    hávsske+A+Pl+Com: hávsskij
    hávsske+A+Ess: hávssken
    hávsske+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: hávsskep
    hávsske+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: hávsskemus

  Adjective - moarrá: # HÁVSSKE
    moarrá+A+Attr: moarrás
    moarrá+A+Sg+Nom: moarrá
    moarrá+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: moarráp
    moarrá+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: moarrámus

  Adjective - : vieddje #  JUHKKE
    vieddje+A+Attr: vieddjes
    vieddje+A+Sg+Nom: vieddje
    vieddje+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vieddjep
    vieddje+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vieddjemus
